California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Regulations, orders or standards of general application to implement, interpret or make specific the law relating to this chapter shall be adopted, amended, or repealed only in accordance with Section 10554. The director shall also provide for the two methods as described in Section 18904.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.1.

(a) The director, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall establish methods for CalFresh benefit issuance in all counties which guarantee to low-income households the health-vital nutritional benefits available under this chapter and to achieve the most efficient system for program administration so as to minimize administrative costs.

(b) The director shall maintain methods for over-the-counter and mail issuance of CalFresh benefits in a county until issuance of CalFresh benefits by electronic benefits transfer for all CalFresh recipients in the county has been implemented pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1.

(c) Until issuance of CalFresh benefits by electronic benefits transfer has been implemented in a county for all CalFresh recipients, the director shall maintain, in the county, methods for over-the-counter issuance that guarantee program accessibility in all cases where a household has been found to be in immediate need of food assistance or where a household has been determined to be eligible for the replacement of a previous issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 76.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.2.

The department may administer outreach programs and adopt rules and regulations requiring counties to conduct outreach programs to the extent permitted by federal law and eligible for federal financial participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 689, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.25.

(a) Pursuant to the federal Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance Act (Public Law 100-77), the department shall develop CalFresh information on expedited services targeted to the homeless population, including unaccompanied homeless children and youths, as those terms are defined in Section 11434a of Title 42 of the United States Code. The department shall also develop information on expedited services specified in Section 18914.5 for victims of domestic violence. This information shall be made available to homeless shelters, domestic violence shelters, emergency food programs, local educational agency liaisons for homeless children and youths, designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and other community agencies who provide services
 to people who are homeless.

(b) Each county human services agency shall annually offer training on CalFresh application procedures to homeless shelter operators. That training shall include eligibility criteria and specific information regarding the eligibility of unaccompanied homeless children and youths. In addition, each county human services agency, upon request, shall provide homeless shelters and domestic violence shelters with a supply of that portion of the CalFresh application used to request CalFresh expedited service.

(c) Upon receipt of a signed CalFresh application from an unaccompanied child or youth under 18 years of age, the county human services agency shall determine eligibility for CalFresh benefits, including making a determination of whether the child or youth is eligible to apply as a household of one or if he or she must apply with members of a household
 with whom he or she is regularly purchasing and preparing foods, and screen the application for entitlement to expedited service pursuant to Section 18914. If the application of the child or youth for CalFresh benefits is denied, the county human services agency shall provide the child or youth a written notice explaining the reason for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.   (AB 2057)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.3.

(a) If a private nonprofit organization, public postsecondary educational institution, or other state or local agency secures funds for CalFresh outreach activities that are allowable for partial federal reimbursement, and complies with contracting requirements established in state and federal law, the department shall, subject to approval of the state’s outreach plan by the United States Department of Agriculture, act as the state entity for receipt of federal reimbursement on behalf of the organization, institution, or agency.

(b) Any reduction in federal funding to the state that is due to the result of any audit of CalFresh outreach contracts or activities shall be applied to
 the appropriate local government that served as the contracting agency for CalFresh outreach activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 290, Sec. 3.   (AB 1747)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.35.

Upon approval of a final plan for CalFresh outreach activities, in accordance with Section 18904.4, the department shall, in determining whether to request federal matching funds for a CalFresh outreach activity, give priority consideration to those activities that implement the final plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 79.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18905.

In the event that the United States Department of Agriculture makes a final determination to reduce federal funding of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, administered in California as CalFresh, due to issuance errors or improper or inadequate county administration of the program, the county or counties responsible for such reduction shall be liable for the amount thereof in accordance with standards adopted by the Director of Social Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 80.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18905.1.

The department shall not impose any additional requirements for verification of eligibility for expedited service other than those minimum requirements that exist under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.

The department shall establish and maintain a plan whereby costs for county administration of CalFresh under this chapter will be effectively controlled within the amounts annually appropriated for such administration. The plan, to be known as the County Administrative Cost Control Plan, shall establish standards and performance criteria, including workload, productivity and support services standards, to which counties shall adhere. The plan shall be part of a single state plan, jointly developed by the department and the State Department of Health Care Services, for administrative cost control for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC), CalFresh, and Medical Assistance (Medi-Cal) programs. Allocations shall be made to each county and shall be limited by
 and determined based upon the County Administrative Cost Control Plan. In administering the plan to control county administrative costs, the department shall not allocate state funds to cover county cost overruns which result from county failure to meet requirements of the plan. The department and the State Department of Health Care Services shall budget, administer, and allocate state funds for county administration in a uniform and consistent manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 81.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.5.

(a) The state shall pay 70 percent of the nonfederal costs of administering the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, administered in California as CalFresh, subject to Sections 18906 and 18906.7. The counties shall pay the remaining share of the nonfederal costs.

(b) The state shall pay 85 percent of the nonfederal share of the costs of AFDC fraud investigation subject to Section 15204.5. The counties shall pay the remaining share of the nonfederal costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 82.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.55.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 18906.5 or any other law, in order to provide fiscal relief for the substantial fiscal pressures on counties created by the unprecedented and unanticipated increase in CalFresh administrative costs as a result of federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), for the 2026–27 to 2028–29 fiscal years, inclusive, the amount of a county’s share of the nonfederal costs for administration of CalFresh is capped at the amount the county expended in its contribution in the 2024–25 fiscal year, or the amount the county was required to contribute to receive its full allocation of state General Fund moneys under the Budget Act of 2024 (Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2024), whichever amount is lower.

(2) Once a
 county has reached the nonfederal share of costs specified in paragraph (1), the county shall receive the full General Fund allocation for administration of CalFresh for that fiscal year.

(3) If projected or estimated costs for the administration of CalFresh decline such that a county’s required contribution to receive its full allocation of state General Fund moneys would be less than the amount specified in paragraph (1), the county’s contribution shall be decreased accordingly and shall be readjusted to be commensurate with cost-sharing ratios of total costs consistent with Section 18906.5. Any such adjustment shall be determined by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California.

(b) The full General Fund allocation for administration of CalFresh for July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2029, inclusive, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall equal
 70 percent of the nonfederal projected funding need for administration of CalFresh.

(c) Relief to the county share of administrative costs authorized by this section shall not result in any increased cost to the General Fund, as determined in subdivision (b).

(d) Subdivision (a) does not prevent a county from expending funds in excess of the amount specified in subdivision (a).

(e) In recognition of county cost pressures, the county share of costs otherwise required pursuant to Section 18906.5 shall be waived for the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) General Fund appropriated and allocated pursuant to Provision 17 of Section 188 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chapter 104 of the Statutes 2025).

(f) This section shall become inoperative on
 July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 33.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.6.

At the time the United States Department of Agriculture allows the state to retain a portion of the value of any claims collected, the state shall retain 50 percent of this portion. The remaining 50 percent shall be distributed by the State Department of Social Services to the counties based upon the amount of claims collected by each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.7.

The state shall pay 100 percent of the nonfederal costs of administering an early fraud prevention and detection program in the administration of this chapter, established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 18902.5, subject to Section 18906.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 24.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.8.

Subject to Section 18906, the state may pay 100 percent of the nonfederal administrative costs, when cost-effective, as determined by the state, of followup activities in the Income Eligibility and Verification System for recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 69, Sec. 63.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18907.

In the determination of eligibility for CalFresh, there shall be no discrimination against any household by reason of marital status, political belief, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code to the extent not in conflict with federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 84.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18908.

Except as provided in Section 18904.1, federal supplemental security income benefits, state supplemental security program benefits, public assistance, and county aid benefits shall not be reduced as a consequence of the receipt of CalFresh benefits under this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 85.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18909.

Section 10850, relating to disclosure of information regarding public assistance recipients, shall apply to information obtained under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

18910.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, regulations, waivers, and directives, the department shall implement the prospective budgeting, semiannual reporting system provided in Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, and related provisions, regarding CalFresh, in a cost-effective manner that promotes compatibility between the CalWORKs program and CalFresh, and minimizes the potential for payment errors.

(b) For CalFresh recipients who also are Medi-Cal beneficiaries and who are subject to the Medi-Cal midyear status reporting requirements, counties shall seek to align the timing of reports required under this section with midyear status reports required by the Medi-Cal program. This subdivision does not apply to CalFresh
 households in which all adult members are elderly or disabled members, as defined in Section 271.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and in which the household has no earned income.

(c) The department shall seek all necessary waivers from the United States Department of Agriculture to implement subdivision (a).

(d) Counties may establish staggered, semiannual reporting cycles for individual households, based on factors established or approved by the department, provided the semiannual reporting cycle is aligned with the certification period; however, all households within a county must be transitioned to a semiannual reporting system simultaneously. Up to and until the establishment of a countywide semiannual reporting system, a county shall operate a quarterly system, as established by law and regulation.

(e) The requirement of subdivision (e) of Section 11265.1 shall apply to the implementation of this section.

(f) (1) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2013. A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with the act that added this section no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(g) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that, due to the establishment of a semiannual
 reporting cycle, change reporting no longer be imposed on certain households that were exempt from quarterly reporting pursuant to federal law. To that end, the department shall work with county human services agencies, client advocates, and the Statewide Automated Welfare System to eliminate change reporting for all households no later than January 1, 2017.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “change reporting” means the reporting requirements imposed on households designated as certified change reporting households pursuant to Section 273.12(a) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 54.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

18910.1.

All CalFresh households shall be assigned certification periods that are the maximum number of months allowable under federal law for the household type unless a county is complying with subdivision (b) of Section 18910 or, on a case-by-case basis only, the household’s individual circumstances require a shorter certification period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 25, Sec. 30.   (AB 1603)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18910.2.

(a) The department shall convene a workgroup that includes, but is not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, representatives of county eligibility workers, the Statewide Automated Welfare System, and client advocates to consider changes to semiannual reporting with the goal of reducing the reporting burden on recipients and reducing the workload for county eligibility staff.

(b) The workgroup shall consider federally allowable reporting structures implemented in other states, consider recommendations in existing research reports, and receive and consider options put forth by workgroup members.

(c) (1) The consensus
 recommendations of the workgroup shall be submitted to the Legislature not later than October 1, 2021, and shall include details regarding potential implementation of these recommendations, including identification of those that the state may implement via state legislation or administrative guidance to counties, as well as those requiring changes in federal law or waivers of federal law. The report may also include ideas that were not consensus items with an opportunity for participating workgroup members to comment on those items.

(2) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on October 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 89.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18911.

(a) An application and an authorization for participation in CalFresh shall be processed within a period of not more than 30 days from the date of application.

(b) The department shall develop written information that describes the eligibility and verification requirements for expedited service, the process for applying for those benefits, and the availability of assistance in filling out the forms and gathering needed documentation.

(c) Each county human services agency shall make the material developed pursuant to subdivision (b) available to each applicant at the time the applicant initially seeks CalFresh
 benefits.

(d) Each county human services agency shall, upon request, make available the information developed pursuant to subdivision (b) to community action agencies, legal services offices, emergency food programs, and other community programs.

(e) (1) Each county human services agency shall, except as specified in paragraph (2), compile a list of emergency food providers in the area served by the local CalFresh office. The list shall be updated, based on information from the emergency food providers. The list shall be made available upon request, and, where needed, may be used to refer individuals to emergency food sites that may be able to provide assistance.

(2) A county human services
 agency may elect to refer a CalFresh applicant or recipient to the 2-1-1 dial code to access information on emergency food providers and supplemental food assistance providers, including child nutrition programs, in lieu of providing a list pursuant to paragraph (1) if the county deems that method to be the most appropriate to serve an applicant or recipient.

(f) Each county human
 services agency shall make available to CalFresh applicants, upon request, nonpromotional information that contains addresses and phone numbers of local legal services and welfare rights organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 68, Sec. 2.   (AB 323)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18912.

(a) Each county welfare department shall orally inform each applicant of the availability of expedited service and assistance in filling out the application.

(b) Each county welfare department shall assist an applicant, upon request of the applicant, in filling out forms and completing the application process for expedited service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 443, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18913.

The department shall collect, quarterly, expedited service data, on a county-by-county basis, of the number of applications and the disposition of the applications, and shall publish those statistics quarterly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 443, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18914.

(a) In accordance with, and to the extent provided by, federal law, the county human services agency shall provide CalFresh benefits on an expedited basis as provided in subdivision (b) to households determined to be in
 immediate need of food assistance.

(b) Pursuant to the federal requirements of Section 273.2(i)(2) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the county human services agency shall screen all CalFresh applications
 for entitlement to expedited service. Applicants who meet the federal criteria for expedited service as defined in Section 273.2(i)(1) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations
 shall receive either a manual authorization to participate or automated card or the immediate issuance of CalFresh benefits no later than the third day following the date the application was filed. To the maximum extent permitted by federal law, the amount of income to be received from any source shall be deemed to be uncertain and exempt from consideration in the determination of entitlement for expedited service. For purposes of this subdivision, a weekend shall be considered one calendar day.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement for expedited issuance a uniform procedure for verifying information required of an applicant.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 88) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 468, Sec. 1.   (AB 1359)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18914.5.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, regulations, waivers, and directives, a resident of, or an individual on a waiting list to get into, a shelter for battered women and children who is currently included in a certified household that also contains the abuser, may apply for and, if otherwise eligible, shall be entitled to expedited services of an additional allotment of CalFresh benefits as a separate household.

(b) For purposes of this section, “shelter for battered women and children” has the same meaning as provided in Section 271.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 859, Sec. 2.   (AB 2057)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18915.

All applications and public information materials shall be available to potential, present, and past CalFresh recipients in each county in Spanish as well as English plus any other non-English language prevalent in each county. It shall be within the discretion of the director to designate such other prevalent non-English languages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 90.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18916.

The board of supervisors of each county shall have the authority to request from the United States Department of Agriculture the simultaneous operation of the federally donated foods program under the Disaster Act of 1970 as amended and any other enabling federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

18917.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall identify the necessary elements of a county disaster plan, and shall issue guidance to county human services agencies informing them of the obligations to submit a disaster plan pursuant to paragraph (2), and of the necessary elements that shall be included in the plan.

(2) A county human services agency shall annually submit to the department a disaster plan that includes the creation of mutual aid regions consisting of two or more counties to ensure there are sufficient resources necessary to continue adequate access to benefits during a disaster. The
 disaster plan shall include elements specified in paragraph (1).

(b) The department shall offer training on Disaster CalFresh to county human services agencies and organizations, institutions, and agencies receiving federal reimbursements pursuant to Section 18904.3.

(c) The department shall maintain updated Disaster CalFresh materials, including, but not limited to, state and county disaster plans, Disaster CalFresh applications, the Disaster CalFresh Internet Web site, and a Disaster CalFresh outreach flyer in all required languages.

(d) If the President of the United States issues a major disaster declaration for individual assistance, the department and the county human services agency shall request to operate a
 federal Disaster Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (D-SNAP) for the regions affected by the major disaster. The request shall include a waiver request to provide automatic, mass replacement benefits to eligible households and a waiver request to allow households to purchase hot, prepared foods at authorized retailers with their benefits.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall maximize the capacity of counties to maintain timely, adequate, and safe access to all applicable benefits during a disaster. In order to ensure that disaster victims are not required to travel through dangerous routes to apply for, and to receive their electronic benefit transfer (EBT) card to access, Disaster CalFresh or replacement benefits, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) If requested by an affected county, provide to the county and its contracted county consortium staff support necessary for out-stationed application intake locations to support timely, adequate, and safe access to Disaster CalFresh during or following a disaster.

(2) Maintain and make available to affected counties, free of charge, technology and equipment to support the mobile issuance of EBT cards to recipients of Disaster CalFresh or replacement
 benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 501, Sec. 6.   (AB 607)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18917.1.

(a) In the event of a declaration by the Governor or the President of the United States of a major disaster, the Legislature finds and declares that the State Department of Social Services and affected county human services agencies will require additional funding to cover the administrative costs to prepare for, and respond to, a declaration by the President of the United States of a major disaster, and to maximize the amount of assistance requested and received through the federal Disaster Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other federally funded nutrition assistance programs, and the costs to prepare for and execute Disaster CalFresh outreach.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, in the event of a
 declaration by the Governor or the President of the United States of a major disaster, an amount necessary to cover the costs of the disaster assistance services specified in subdivision (a) shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the State Department of Social Services from the General Fund. The amounts appropriated to the department shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per disaster declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 7, Sec. 10.   (AB 118)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18917.2.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall maximize the amount of assistance requested and received through the federal Disaster Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (D-SNAP), and all other federally funded nutrition assistance programs, including utilizing necessary data, provided in accordance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 8410) of Division 4.1 of the Public Utilities Code, in order for the department to timely seek automated mass replacement of SNAP benefits, D-SNAP, the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program, known in California as SUN Bucks, and any other federally funded nutrition assistance programs.

(b) The
 department shall maintain contact with each electrical corporation and local publicly owned electric utility in accordance with
 Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 8410) of Division 4.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) (1) On or before December 31, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes both of the following:

(A) Any further ways to ensure that California maximizes all available federal food assistance during state and federally declared disasters, public health emergencies, or other crises that enable the provision of resources to California households.

(B) Any additional oversight or actions needed to fulfill the objectives of this section and Section 18917.

(2) (A) The requirement
 for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(B) The report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 709, Sec. 2.   (AB 777)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18918.

Not later than January 15, 2001, the State Department of Social Services, in conjunction with the State Department of Public Health and appropriate stakeholders, shall develop and submit to the Legislature a community outreach and education campaign to help families learn about, and apply for, the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, administered in California as CalFresh, and the California Food Assistance Program. At a minimum, the plan shall include the following:

(a) Specific milestones and objectives proposed to be completed for the upcoming year and their anticipated cost.

(b) A general description of each strategy or
 method to be used for outreach.

(c) Geographic areas and special populations to be targeted, if any, and why the special targeting is needed.

(d) Coordination with other state or county education and outreach efforts.

(e) The results of previous years’ outreach efforts.

(1) If necessary to obtain federal financial participation the CalFresh outreach plan shall be submitted to the United States Department of Agriculture not later than January 15, 2001. The state share of the funding shall be subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act and may be funded through the General Fund or other state or local funding sources, as appropriate.

(2) After submission of the initial plan, it shall
 be updated annually and submitted to the Legislature by April 1 for the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 91.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18918.1.

(a) In an effort to expand CalFresh program outreach and retention and improve dual enrollment between the CalFresh and Medi-Cal programs, county welfare departments shall, no later than January 1, 2023, complete all of the following:

(1) Ensure that Medi-Cal applicants applying in-person, online, or by telephone, and who also may be eligible for CalFresh, are screened and given the opportunity to apply at the same time they are applying for Medi-Cal or submitting information for the renewal process.

(2) Ensure the same staff that receive Medi-Cal and CalFresh applications pursuant to paragraph (1) during the Medi-Cal application, renewal, or application and renewal processes conduct the eligibility determination functions needed to determine eligibility or ineligibility to CalFresh.

(3) Designate one or more county liaisons to establish
 CalFresh application referral and communication procedures on outreach activities between counties and community-based organizations facilitating Medi-Cal enrollment.

(b) Upon certification to the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, counties shall provide prepopulated CalFresh applications to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are apparently CalFresh eligible and not dually enrolled during the Medi-Cal renewal process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 83.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18919.

(a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall issue an annual all-county letter providing guidance that lists which counties or regions are eligible to participate in the Restaurant Meals Program (RMP) because they meet the requirements established in Section 4014 of the federal Agricultural Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-79). The department’s all-county letter shall include instructions for how a county may choose to administer the RMP in that county or appeal a noneligible determination by the department.

(b) The department shall design the electronic benefits transfer (EBT) system established pursuant
 to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 to, automatically and upon issuance of an EBT card, allow all CalFresh recipients who are eligible for the RMP to utilize their benefits in all restaurants that have been approved to participate in the RMP.

(c) Except for direct farm purchasing programs or if otherwise not required at a certified farmer’s market, a restaurant shall not operate as a vendor in the program unless the restaurant permits customers to make in-store purchases, maintains a current public health license, and complies with all federal, state, and local health and safety laws, regulations, and ordinances. For the purpose of this section, “in-store purchase” means any purchase that is not delivered to the purchaser.

(d) To the extent permitted by federal law, a county, in administering its RMP program, shall not be precluded from determining the number,
 type, and location of restaurants the county chooses to include as vendors to align with county administrative capacity or other factors, including, but not limited to, location of participating restaurants and recipient demand.

(e) (1) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department, in consultation with various stakeholders, including, but not limited to, county human services agencies and advocates for CalFresh recipients, shall establish a statewide RMP.

(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall implement this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the director on or before September 1, 2021.

(f) To prevent hunger among college students who are homeless, elderly, or disabled, and to facilitate compliance with Section 66025.93 of the Education Code, the department may enter into a statewide memorandum of understanding with the Chancellor of the California State University, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or both. Any qualifying food facility located on a campus of the California State University or a campus of the California Community Colleges may participate in the CalFresh RMP through this statewide memorandum of understanding.

(g) For purposes of this section, unless it is specifically excluded from participation in the RMP by federal law or guidance, a restaurant includes,
 but is not necessarily limited to, an on-campus qualifying food facility, as defined in Section 66025.93 of the Education Code, an eat-in establishment, a grocery store delicatessen, and a takeaway-only restaurant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 84.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18919.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to maximize food access for all CalFresh recipients. Many of the hungriest Californians who rely on CalFresh to eat face the most significant barriers, including the lack of kitchen facilities or means of preparing and cooking meals with groceries, special dietary needs, or specific foods required for medications, among other factors that strain the ability of traditional groceries to meet their needs. It is further the intent of the Legislature to maximize the dignity and equitable treatment of Californians using CalFresh to purchase food by maximizing food choices.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall
 maximize all available food choices for CalFresh recipients, including, but not limited to, hot foods or hot food products ready for immediate consumption, pursuant to Section 3(k) of the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   (AB 553)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18920.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an agreement between the department and a unit of local government, any other unit of state government, or a nonprofit organization that provides for a contract relating to either of the following is and shall be deemed a “cooperative agreement,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 38072 of the Health and Safety Code:

(1) Outreach programs related to CalFresh.

(2) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program: Nutrition Education and Obesity Prevention Grant Program.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 38072 of the Health and
 Safety Code, for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 38070) of Division 25.2 of the Health and Safety Code, any reference to the term “department” in those provisions shall refer to the State Department of Social Services for purposes of an agreement described in subdivision (a).

(c) In addition to the authority granted the department in subdivision (a) of Section 38081.1 of the Health and Safety Code, a change of subcontracts shall not be subject to review and approval by the Department of General Services pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that this section shall be applied retroactively to currently executed agreements that are described in subdivision (a).
